Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.278

Residency principal certificates—Principal preparation program requirements.

(1) After August 31, 2013, candidates for a residency principal certificate must have demonstrated knowledge of teacher evaluation research and Washington's evaluation requirements and successfully completed opportunities to practice teacher evaluation skills.

(2) At a minimum, principal preparation programs must address the following knowledge and skills related to evaluations under RCW 28A.405.100:

(a) Examination of teacher and principal evaluation criteria, and four-level rating evaluation system, and the preferred instructional and leadership frameworks used to describe the evaluation criteria;

(b) Classroom observations;

(c) The use of student growth data and multiple measures of performance;

(d) Evaluation conferencing;

(e) Development of classroom teacher and principal support plans resulting from an evaluation; and

(f) Use of an online tool to manage the collection of observation notes, teacher and principal-submitted materials, and other information related to the conduct of the evaluation.

[ 2019 c 295 s 304; 2012 c 35 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.